src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON нсв_нп_a_ехать
+V+Impf+IV:ха Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:д PresFut_1_stem ; 
+V+Impf+IV:д%<у PresAct ;

LEXICON св_нп_a_поехать
св_нп_a_буд._-ду,_-дет_повел._нет ;
+V+Perf+IV:зжа́ Imper_unstressed ;

LEXICON св_нп_a_буд._-ду,_-дет_повел._нет
+V+Perf+IV:ха Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:д PresFut_1_stem ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:дем # ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_b_реветь
+V+Impf+IV:е́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON св_b?_-реветь
св_нп_b_-реветь ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_b_-реветь
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_b_R_-реветься
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_b/b_идти
+V+Impf+IV+Inf:идти́ # ;
+V+Impf+IV:ш%^G%^Fё Past_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:ше́%^d PastAct ;
+V+Impf+IV:ше́%^d Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:ид PresFut_1_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:ид Imper_stressed ;
+V+Impf+IV:ид%<у́ PresAct ;
+V+Impf+IV:ид PresVrbAdv_end ;

LEXICON нсв_b/b_R_идтись
+V+Impf+IV+Inf:идти́сь # ;
+V+Impf+IV:ш%^G%^Fё Past_end_R_безл. ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:ид PresFut_1_end_R_безл. ;

LEXICON св_нп_a9_выйти
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:йти # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ш%^G%^Fё Past_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:йд PastVrbAdv_9_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:ше%^d PastAct ;
+V+Perf+IV:йд Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_b_R_-шибиться
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:и́ться # ;
+V+Perf+IV: Past_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:и́ PastAct_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_a_-шибить
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:ить # ;
+V+Perf+IV: Past_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV:и PastAct ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:и́ть # ;
+V+Perf+TV: Past_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+TV:и PastAct ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_b_-шибить
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:и́ть # ;
+V+Perf+IV: Past_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV:и́ PastAct ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:и́ть # ;
+V+Perf+TV: Past_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ PastAct ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_шла/,_ше/дший
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:йти́ # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ш%^G%^Fё Past_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:йд PastVrbAdv_9_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:ше́%^d PastAct ;
+V+Perf+IV:йд Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_-шла/,_-ше/дший
св_нп_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_шла/,_ше/дший ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:йти́ # ;
+V+Perf+TV:ш%^G%^Fё Past_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:йд PastVrbAdv_9_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ше́%^d PastAct ;
+V+Perf+TV:йд Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:йдё PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_-шла/,_-ше/дший_/Vйденный
св_нп_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_шла/,_ше/дший ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:йти́ # ;
+V+Perf+TV:ш%^G%^Fё Past_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:йд PastVrbAdv_9_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ше́%^d PastAct ;
+V+Perf+TV:йд Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:йде PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_b/b9_R_буд._йд|у/сь,_-ётся_прош._шёлся,_-шла/сь
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:йти́сь # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ш%^G%^Fё Past_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:йд PastVrbAdv_9_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:ше́%^d PastAct_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:йд Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_b/b9_буд._приду/,_-ёт,_18_прош._при|шёл,_-шл
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:йти́ # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ш%^G%^Fё Past_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:д PastVrbAdv_9_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:ше́%^d PastAct ;
+V+Perf+IV:д Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_b/b9_R_буд._прид|у/сь,_-ётся_прош._при|шёлся,_-
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:йти́сь # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ш%^G%^Fё Past_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:д PastVrbAdv_9_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:ше́%^d PastAct_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:д Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_a_дать ! выдать
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:дать # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV:да Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV:да PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:дам # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:дашь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:даст # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:дадим # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:дадите # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:дадут # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:дадим # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да Imper_unstressed ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:дать # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:да Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+TV:да PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1:дам # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2:дашь # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3:даст # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1:дадим # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2:дадите # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3:дадут # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:дадим # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да Imper_unstressed ;
+V+Perf+TV:да PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_a_R_даться ! выдаться
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:даться # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да Past_shift_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:да Perf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:да PastAct_R ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:дамся # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:дашься # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:дастся # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:дадимся # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:дадитесь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:дадутся # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:дадимся # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да Imper_unstressed_R ;

LEXICON св_b/c_дать
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:да́ть # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:да́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:да́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:да́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:дади́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:дади́те # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:даду́т # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:дади́м # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:да́ть # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1:да́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2:да́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3:да́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1:дади́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2:дади́те # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3:даду́т # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:дади́м # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+TV:да PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_b/c'_дать ! simplex дать
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:да́ть # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Past_shift' ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:да́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:да́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:да́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:дади́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:дади́те # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:даду́т # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:дади́м # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:да́ть # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Past_shift' ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1:да́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2:да́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3:да́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1:дади́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2:дади́те # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3:даду́т # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:дади́м # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_b/c[1]_дать
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:да́ть # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:да́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:да́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:да́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:дади́м # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:дади́те # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:даду́т # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:дади́м # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:да́ть # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ PastAct ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1:да́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2:да́шь # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3:да́ст # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1:дади́м # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2:дади́те # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3:даду́т # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:дади́м # ;
+V+Perf+TV:да́ Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+TV:да PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_b/c''_R_даться
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:да́ться # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Past_shift''_R_Fac ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Past_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ PastAct_R ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1:да́мся # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2:да́шься # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3:да́стся # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1:дади́мся # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2:дади́тесь # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3:даду́тся # ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:дади́мся # ;
+V+Perf+IV:да́ Imper_stressed_R ;

LEXICON св_a_есть
св_нп_a_есть ;
+V+Perf+TV:ед Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1:ем # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2:ешь # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3:ест # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1:едим # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2:едите # ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3:едят # ;
+V+Perf+TV:еш Imper_unstressed ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:едим # ;
