src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
идтись: нсв_b/b_R_идтись ;
ехать:е́ нсв_нп_a_ехать "weight: 3.487073081131419" ;
реветь:рев нсв_нп_b_реветь "weight: 2.9309606020175254" ;
идти: нсв_нп_b/b_идти "weight: 4.552823541375747" ;
выдаться:вы́ св_a_R_даться "weight: 2.0576058024398427" ;
вышибить:в%^Yшиб св_a_-шибить "weight: 2.105910482014398" ;
выдать:вы́ св_a_дать "weight: 4.111813163850084" ;
объехать:объе́ св_нп_a_буд._-ду,_-дет_повел._нет "weight: 1.8685495662197937" ;
нареветься:нарев св_b_R_-реветься ;
обреветься:обрев св_b_R_-реветься ;
разреветься:разрев св_b_R_-реветься ;
зашибиться:заши́б св_b_R_-шибиться ;
ошибиться:оши́б св_b_R_-шибиться ;
сшибиться:сши́б св_b_R_-шибиться ;
расшибиться:расши́б св_b_R_-шибиться ;
ушибиться:уши́б св_b_R_-шибиться ;
выесть:вы́ св_a_есть "weight: 2.72478397235201" ;
обшибить:обши́б св_b_-шибить ;
вшибить:вши́б св_b_-шибить ;
перешибить:переши́б св_b_-шибить "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
дошибить:доши́б св_b_-шибить ;
сшибить:сши́б св_b_-шибить "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
отшибить:отши́б св_b_-шибить "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
разойтись:разо св_b/b9_R_буд._йд|у/сь,_-ётся_прош._шёлся,_-шла/сь "weight: 2.70797047334236" ;
пройтись:про св_b/b9_R_буд._йд|у/сь,_-ётся_прош._шёлся,_-шла/сь ;
сойтись:со св_b/b9_R_буд._йд|у/сь,_-ётся_прош._шёлся,_-шла/сь "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ;
зайтись:за св_b/b9_R_буд._йд|у/сь,_-ётся_прош._шёлся,_-шла/сь ;
найтись:на св_b/b9_R_буд._йд|у/сь,_-ётся_прош._шёлся,_-шла/сь ;
прийтись:при св_b/b9_R_буд._прид|у/сь,_-ётся_прош._при|шёлся,_- ;
перейти:пере́ св_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_-шла/,_-ше/дший "weight: 3.5611561675999557" ;
прейти:пре́ св_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_-шла/,_-ше/дший "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
обойти:обо́ св_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_-шла/,_-ше/дший "weight: 3.0677061293441685" ;
превзойти:превзо́ св_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_-шла/,_-ше/дший "weight: 2.746234973437643" ;
найти:на́ св_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_-шла/,_-ше/дший_/Vйденный "weight: 4.645646703265782" ;
пройти:про св_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_-шла/,_-ше/дший "weight: 4.423753976688029" ;
наддать:на́д св_b/c_дать ;
наподдать:напо́д св_b/c_дать ;
переиздать:переи́з св_b/c_дать "weight: 3.02028147941603" ;
воссоздать:воссо́з св_b/c_дать "weight: 3.147303167172623" ;
пересдать:перес св_b/c_дать "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ; ! TODO PPParticiple stress
дать: св_b/c'_дать "weight: 4.798479126304382" ;
обдаться:об св_b/c''_R_даться ;
поддаться:под св_b/c''_R_даться "weight: 2.7666761336801873" ;
создаться:соз св_b/c''_R_даться "weight: 3.600211574425831" ;
запродаться:запро св_b/c''_R_даться ;
удаться:у св_b/c''_R_даться "weight: 2.872479859848226" ;
обдать:о́б св_b/c[1]_дать "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
предать:пре́ св_b/c[1]_дать "weight: 3.8112339149643994" ;
недодать:недо́ св_b/c[1]_дать "weight: 1.9411002333684055" ;
запродать:запро́ св_b/c[1]_дать "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
пораспродать:пораспро́ св_b/c[1]_дать ;
прореветь:прорев св_b?_-реветь ;
заехать:зае́ св_нп_a_буд._-ду,_-дет_повел._нет "weight: 2.4803693948369125" ;
приехать:прие́ св_нп_a_буд._-ду,_-дет_повел._нет "weight: 4.01128023530124" ;
уехать:уе́ св_нп_a_буд._-ду,_-дет_повел._нет "weight: 3.282001741070079" ;
съехать:съе́ св_нп_a_буд._-ду,_-дет_повел._нет "weight: 2.598008892703713" ;
поехать:пое́ св_нп_a_поехать "weight: 2.470609557547756" ;
выйти:вы́ св_нп_a9_выйти "weight: 4.236582749733012" ;
зареветь:зарев св_нп_b_-реветь "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
взреветь:взрев св_нп_b_-реветь "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
пореветь:порев св_нп_b_-реветь ;
отреветь:отрев св_нп_b_-реветь ;
войти:во св_нп_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_шла/,_ше/дший "weight: 3.9742145520899284" ;
подойти:подо св_нп_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_шла/,_ше/дший "weight: 3.489914712743143" ;
сойти:со св_нп_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_шла/,_ше/дший "weight: 3.237090004392863" ;
уйти:у св_нп_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_шла/,_ше/дший "weight: 4.031819392809787" ;
изойти:изо св_нп_b/b9_буд._йду/,_-ёт_прош._шёл,_шла/,_ше/дший "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
прийти:при св_нп_b/b9_буд._приду/,_-ёт,_18_прош._при|шёл,_-шл "weight: 4.287302698553319" ;
